Utah statutes.
71-8-8.   Entity that provides no services -- Referral to department.

A government entity that does not provide services to veterans shall, upon a request for services by a veteran, direct the veteran to contact the department, and provide the veteran with the department contact information.



Enacted by Chapter 308, 2013 General Session

